Maryland, session 2026, HB1256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
2.5–109.
(a) In this section, “economic development program” means:
(4) each of the tax credit programs administered by the Department,
including:
(vii) the [Innovation Investment Incentive] ANGEL INVESTOR Tax
Credit;
6–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Program” means the Opportunity Zone Enhancement Program in the
Department established under § 6–1002 of this subtitle that allows enhanced tax credits
under:
(5) § 10–733 of the Tax – General Article [(cybersecurity investment
incentive)] (ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT); and

HOUSE BILL 1256 3
6–1007.
(a) In this section, “investment”, “qualified investor”, and “qualified Maryland
[technology] company” have the meanings stated in § 10–733 of the Tax – General Article.
(b) For a qualified opportunity fund that is a qualified investor in a qualified
Maryland [technology] company under § 10–733 of the Tax – General Article, if the
qualified Maryland [technology] company[, on or after March 1, 2018,] is newly established
in or expands into an opportunity zone in a county other than Allegany County, Dorchester
County, Garrett County, or Somerset County:
(1) the Level 1 opportunity zone enhancement is 33% of the investment in
a qualified Maryland [technology] company, not to exceed $300,000; and
(2) the Level 2 opportunity zone enhancement is 50% of the investment in
the qualified Maryland [technology] company, not to exceed $500,000.
(c) The enhanced tax credit percentages and maximums authorized under
subsection (b) of this section are in substitution for and not in addition to the percentages
and maximums under [§ 10–733(d)] § 10–733(F) of the Tax – General Article.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
79. the [Innovation Investment] ANGEL INVESTOR TAX
CREDIT RESERVE Fund;
Article – Tax – General
10–733.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1256
(2) (I) “COMPANY” MEANS ANY ENTITY OF ANY FORM DULY
ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY JURISDICTION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT.
(II) “COMPANY” INCLUDES AN ENTITY THAT BECOMES DULY
ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY JURISDICTION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT WITHIN 4 MONTHS OF RECEIVING
A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT.
(III) “COMPANY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP.
(3) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE.
(4) (I) “INVESTMENT” MEANS THE CONTRIBUTION OF MONEY IN
CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENTS EXPRESSED IN UNITED STATES DOLLARS, AT A RISK
OF LOSS, TO A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY IN EXCHANGE FOR STOCK, A
PARTNERSHIP OR MEMBERSHIP INTEREST, OR ANY OTHER OWNERSHIP INTEREST
IN THE EQUITY OF THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, TITLE TO WHICH
OWNERSHIP INTEREST SHALL VEST IN THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR.
(II) “INVESTMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE DEBT UNLESS IT IS
CONVERTIBLE DEBT.
(III) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, AN INVESTMENT IS AT
RISK OF LOSS WHEN REPAYMENT ENTIRELY DEPENDS ON THE SUCCESS OF THE
BUSINESS OPERATIONS OF THE COMPANY.
(5) (I) “QUALIFIED INVESTOR” MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY
THAT INVESTS AT LEAST $25,000 IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY AND THAT
IS REQUIRED TO FILE AN INCOME TAX RETURN IN ANY JURISDICTION.
(II) “QUALIFIED INVESTOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A QUALIFIED PENSION PLAN, AN INDIVIDUAL
RETIREMENT ACCOUNT, OR ANY OTHER QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLAN UNDER THE
EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY ACT OF 1974 OR FIDUCIARIES OR
CUSTODIANS UNDER SUCH PLANS, OR SIMILAR TAX–FAVORED PLANS OR ENTITIES
UNDER THE LAWS OF OTHER COUNTRIES; OR
2. A FOUNDER OR CURRENT EMPLOYEE OF THE
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, IF THE COMPANY HAS BEEN IN ACTIVE BUSINESS
FOR MORE THAN 5 YEARS.

HOUSE BILL 1256 5
(6) (I) “QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY” MEANS A COMPANY
THAT HAS MET THE CRITERIA IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) “QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
COMPANY THAT IS OR HAS BEEN CERTIFIED AS A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
BIOTECHNOLOGY COMPANY UNDER § 10–725 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(7) “RESERVE FUND” MEANS THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT
RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(8) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE.
(B) (1) THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT IS INTENDED TO FOSTER THE
GROWTH OF THE STATE’S INNOVATIVE SECTORS BY INCENTIVIZING INVESTMENT IN
EARLY–STAGE COMPANIES WITH THE GOAL OF INCREASING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF INNOVATIVE COMPANIES DEVELOPING IN
MARYLAND;
(II) THE OVERALL INVESTMENTS IN CURRENT AND EMERGING
ECONOMIC SECTORS; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS ACTIVELY
INVESTING IN MARYLAND COMPANIES.
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C), (E), AND (F) OF THIS SECTION, FOR
THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH AN INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY IS MADE, A QUALIFIED INVESTOR MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE
STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT STATED IN THE FINAL
CREDIT CERTIFICATE APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY FOR THE INVESTMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE TAX CREDIT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR:
(I) MAY NOT, AFTER MAKING THE PROPOSED INVESTMENT,
OWN OR CONTROL MORE THAN 25% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY IN WHICH THE INVESTMENT IS MADE; AND
(II) AT LEAST 30 DAYS PRIOR TO MAKING AN INVESTMENT IN A
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING:

HOUSE BILL 1256
1. EVIDENCE THAT THE INVESTOR IS:
A. IF A COMPANY, DULY ORGANIZED AND IN GOOD
STANDING IN THE JURISDICTION UNDER THE LAWS UNDER WHICH IT IS ORGANIZED;
B. CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL TAX OBLIGATIONS
TO A STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF A STATE; AND
C. NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY
CONTRACT WITH, INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM A STATE OR ANY UNIT OR
SUBDIVISION OF A STATE;
2. EVIDENCE THAT THE COMPANY HAS SATISFIED THE
FOLLOWING MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS TO BE CONSIDERED A QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY:
A. HAS ITS HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS
IN THE STATE;
B. HAS NOT PARTICIPATED IN THE TAX CREDIT
PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION FOR MORE THAN 3 PRIOR FISCAL YEARS;
C. HAS AN AGGREGATE CAPITALIZATION OF AT LEAST
$100,000;
D. OWNS OR HAS PROPERLY LICENSED ANY
PROPRIETARY TECHNOLOGY;
E. HAS FEWER THAN 50 FULL–TIME EMPLOYEES;
F. DOES NOT HAVE ITS SECURITIES PUBLICLY TRADED
ON ANY EXCHANGE;
G. IS IN GOOD STANDING;
H. IS CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL TAX
OBLIGATIONS TO THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
I. IS NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY
CONTRACT WITH, INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1256 7
J. MEETS ANY OTHER REASONABLE REQUIREMENTS OF
THE DEPARTMENT EVIDENCING THAT THE COMPANY IS A GOING CONCERN
ENGAGED IN THE RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR COMMERCIALIZATION OF
INNOVATIVE AND PROPRIETARY IDEAS IN AN ELIGIBLE ECONOMIC SECTOR
IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
3. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT MAY
REQUIRE.
(2) (I) A COMPANY QUALIFIES FOR INVESTMENTS THAT ARE
ELIGIBLE FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE COMPANY ENGAGES IN
ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING ECONOMIC SECTORS:
1. ADVANCED MANUFACTURING;
2. BIOSCIENCES;
3. CYBERSECURITY;
4. TECHNOLOGY; OR
5. AN ECONOMIC SECTOR DESIGNATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) AFTER CONSULTING WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, EACH YEAR THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION SHALL:
1. EVALUATE THE POTENTIAL EMPLOYMENT AND
ECONOMIC GROWTH OF THE STATE’S ECONOMIC SECTORS; AND
2. RECOMMEND ADDITIONAL QUALIFYING ECONOMIC
SECTORS TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(III) EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. CONSIDER THE RECOMMENDATION OF THE
MARYLAND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION; AND
2. DESIGNATE ADDITIONAL ECONOMIC SECTORS TO
INCLUDE ON THE LIST OF SECTORS IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.

HOUSE BILL 1256
(IV) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A COMPANY IS ENGAGED IN AN
ELIGIBLE ECONOMIC SECTOR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER THE
DEFINITIONS SET FORTH IN THE NORTH AMERICAN INDUSTRY CLASSIFICATION
SYSTEM (NAICS).
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN AN ONLINE PORTAL THAT:
(I) PUBLICLY PROVIDES INFORMATION ABOUT THE TAX
CREDIT, INCLUDING A CURRENT LIST OF ELIGIBLE ECONOMIC SECTORS;
(II) SECURELY MANAGES APPLICATIONS FOR CREDITS UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(III) PROVIDES APPLICATION STATUS UPDATES TO APPLICANTS.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PROVISIONS OF LAW REQUIRING
DISCLOSURE, INFORMATION PROVIDED AS PART OF AN APPLICATION UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC BY A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) APPROVE ALL APPLICATIONS THAT QUALIFY FOR CREDITS UNDER
THIS SECTION ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS; AND
(2) WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS OF RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION:
(I) CERTIFY THE AMOUNT OF ANY APPROVED TAX CREDITS TO
A QUALIFIED INVESTOR; AND
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER A COMPANY QUALIFIES FOR
INVESTMENTS THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE DEPARTMENT ISSUES AN
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED INVESTOR
SHALL HAVE 30 CALENDAR DAYS TO MAKE AN INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) WITHIN 10 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH A
QUALIFIED INVESTOR MAKES THE INVESTMENT, THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SHALL
PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT NOTICE AND PROOF OF THE MAKING OF THE
INVESTMENT, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1256 9
1. THE DATE OF THE INVESTMENT;
2. THE AMOUNT INVESTED;
3. PROOF OF THE RECEIPT OF THE INVESTED FUNDS BY
THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY;
4. A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE OF THE
OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE EQUITY OF THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY
ACQUIRED IN CONSIDERATION OF THE INVESTMENT; AND
5. ANY REASONABLE SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION
THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE.
(III) IF A QUALIFIED INVESTOR DOES NOT PROVIDE THE NOTICE
AND PROOF OF THE MAKING OF THE INVESTMENT REQUIRED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH WITHIN 40 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT ISSUES AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION:
1. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RESCIND THE INITIAL TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
2. THE CREDIT AMOUNT ALLOCATED TO THE RESCINDED
CERTIFICATE SHALL REVERT TO THE RESERVE FUND AND SHALL BE AVAILABLE IN
THE APPLICABLE FISCAL YEAR FOR ALLOCATION BY THE DEPARTMENT TO OTHER
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
(F) (1) THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED IN AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IS:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
33% OF THE INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, NOT TO EXCEED
$250,000; OR
(II) IF A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY IS LOCATED IN
ALLEGANY COUNTY, DORCHESTER COUNTY, GARRETT COUNTY, OR SOMERSET
COUNTY, 50% OF THE INVESTMENT IN THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, NOT
TO EXCEED $500,000.
(2) DURING ANY FISCAL YEAR, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT CERTIFY
ELIGIBILITY FOR TAX CREDITS FOR INVESTMENTS IN:

HOUSE BILL 1256
(I) A SINGLE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY THAT IN THE
AGGREGATE EXCEED 15% OF THE TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE RESERVE FUND
FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR; OR
(II) A SINGLE ECONOMIC SECTOR THAT IN THE AGGREGATE
EXCEED 25% OF THE TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE RESERVE FUND FOR THAT
FISCAL YEAR.
(3) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE
YEAR EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, AN INDIVIDUAL
OR A CORPORATION MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
(G) (1) (I) THERE IS AN ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT RESERVE
FUND WHICH IS A SPECIAL CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT SUBJECT
TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE MONEY IN THE RESERVE FUND SHALL BE INVESTED
AND REINVESTED BY THE TREASURER, AND INTEREST AND EARNINGS SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(III) THE MONEY IN THE RESERVE FUND MAY BE USED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE TO A QUALIFIED
INVESTOR FOR EACH APPROVED INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY ELIGIBLE FOR A TAX CREDIT.
(II) AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL STATE THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT FOR WHICH THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR IS ELIGIBLE.
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT ISSUE INITIAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR CREDIT AMOUNTS IN THE AGGREGATE TOTALING
MORE THAN THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND FOR THAT FISCAL
YEAR IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AS
REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT NEEDED TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. IF THE AGGREGATE CREDIT AMOUNTS UNDER INITIAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED IN A FISCAL YEAR TOTAL LESS THAN THE

HOUSE BILL 1256 11
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR, ANY
EXCESS AMOUNT SHALL REMAIN IN THE RESERVE FUND AND MAY BE ISSUED UNDER
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR.
3. FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, IF FUNDS ARE TRANSFERRED
FROM THE RESERVE FUND UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF ANY PROVISION OF LAW
OTHER THAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAXIMUM CREDIT
AMOUNTS IN THE AGGREGATE FOR WHICH THE SECRETARY MAY ISSUE INITIAL TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATES SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT TRANSFERRED.
(IV) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE
IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $2,000,000 TO THE RESERVE
FUND.
(V) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–213 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT REDUCE
AN APPROPRIATION TO THE RESERVE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED
BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(VI) BASED ON THE ACTUAL AMOUNT OF AN INVESTMENT MADE
BY A QUALIFIED INVESTOR, THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A FINAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS PARAGRAPH,
MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND SHALL REMAIN IN THE RESERVE
FUND.
(II) 1. WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH CALENDAR
QUARTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE COMPTROLLER AS TO EACH FINAL
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED DURING THE QUARTER:
A. THE MAXIMUM CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE INVESTMENT IN THE QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY; AND
B. THE FINAL CERTIFIED CREDIT AMOUNT FOR THE
INVESTMENT IN THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY.
2. ON NOTIFICATION THAT AN INVESTMENT HAS BEEN
CERTIFIED, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE
INVESTMENT FROM THE RESERVE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.

HOUSE BILL 1256
(III) 1. PERIODICALLY, BUT NOT MORE FREQUENTLY THAN
QUARTERLY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY SUBMIT INVOICES FOR COSTS THAT HAVE
BEEN INCURRED OR ARE ANTICIPATED TO BE INCURRED IN ADMINISTERING THE
TAX CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER MONEY FROM
THE RESERVE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT TO PAY FOR COSTS THAT HAVE BEEN
INCURRED OR ARE ANTICIPATED TO BE INCURRED IN ADMINISTERING THE TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) THE CREDIT CLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
RECAPTURED AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF WITHIN 2
YEARS FROM THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT IS
CLAIMED:
(I) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR
OTHERWISE DISPOSES OF THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY THAT GAVE RISE TO THE CREDIT; OR
(II) THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY THAT GAVE RISE TO
THE CREDIT:
1. CEASES OPERATING AS AN ACTIVE BUSINESS WITH ITS
HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS IN THE STATE; OR
2. PAYS OUT AS DIVIDENDS OR OTHERWISE
DISTRIBUTES THE EQUITY INVESTMENT.
(2) THE CREDIT CLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
RECAPTURED AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF, WITHIN 4
MONTHS OF RECEIVING A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT, A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY IS NOT DULY ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY
JURISDICTION FOR THE PURPOSES OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT.
(3) THE AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE RECAPTURED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT CLAIMED OR, IN THE
CASE OF AN EVENT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PORTION OF THE CREDIT ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST DISPOSED
OF; AND

HOUSE BILL 1256 13
(II) 1. 100%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS
CLAIMED;
2. 67%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS DURING THE FIRST YEAR AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR
FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS CLAIMED; OR
3. 33%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS MORE THAN 1 YEAR BUT NOT MORE THAN 2 YEARS AFTER THE
CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS CLAIMED.
(4) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR THAT CLAIMED THE CREDIT SHALL
PAY THE AMOUNT TO BE RECAPTURED AS DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AS TAXES PAYABLE TO THE STATE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN
WHICH THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE CREDIT OCCURS.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE ITS INITIAL OR FINAL
CERTIFICATION OF AN APPROVED CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IF ANY
REPRESENTATION MADE IN CONNECTION WITH THE APPLICATION FOR THE
CERTIFICATION IS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO HAVE BEEN FALSE.
(2) THE REVOCATION MAY BE IN FULL OR IN PART AS THE
DEPARTMENT MAY DETERMINE AND, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SHALL BE COMMUNICATED TO THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR, THE
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, AND THE COMPTROLLER.
(3) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SHALL HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO
APPEAL ANY REVOCATION TO THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO NOTIFICATION OF THE
COMPTROLLER.
(4) THE COMPTROLLER MAY MAKE AN ASSESSMENT AGAINST THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR TO RECAPTURE ANY AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT THAT THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR HAS ALREADY CLAIMED.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT OUTREACH ABOUT THE TAX
CREDIT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION TO INCUBATORS, INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION, AND INVESTOR NETWORKS.
(K) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2.5–109 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE INITIAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 1256
(L) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMPTROLLER JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND TO SPECIFY
CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES FOR APPLICATION FOR, APPROVAL OF, AND
MONITORING CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
Chapter 717 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, and unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other
federal requirement, or with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, for fiscal years
2024 through 2028, net interest on all State money allocated by the State Treasurer under
§ 6–226 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to special funds or accounts, and
otherwise entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall
accrue to the General Fund of the State, with the exception of the following funds:
(54) the [Innovation Investment Fund] ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT
RESERVE FUND;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2036. It shall remain effective for a period of 10 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2036, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.